Maryland, session 2026, HB0430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Child care provider” means the adult who has primary responsibility for the
operation of a family child care home or a large family child care home.
(e) “Family child care home” means a residence in which family child care is
provided for up to eight children.
(f) “Family child care provider” means an individual who cares for children in a
registered family child care home or a registered large family child care home.
9.5–305.1.
– 1 –

Ch. 732 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MILITARY RESERVES” MEANS THE U.S. ARMY
RESERVE, U.S. NAVY RESERVE, AIR FORCE RESERVE COMMAND, U.S. MARINE
CORPS RESERVE, OR U.S. COAST GUARD RESERVE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER WHO
IS A MEMBER OF THE NATIONAL GUARD OR MILITARY RESERVES A RESERVE
COMPONENT.
(C) (B) A FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER SHALL DESIGNATE A
SUBSTITUTE TO PROVIDE FAMILY CHILD CARE DURING THE FAMILY CHILD CARE
PROVIDER’S ABSENCE FOR REQUIRED TRAINING AND ACTIVE SERVICE IN THE
NATIONAL GUARD OR MILITARY RESERVES A RESERVE COMPONENT.
(D) (C) A FAMILY CARE PROVIDER UNDER SUBSECTION (C) (B) OF THIS
SECTION MAY USE THE DESIGNATED SUBSTITUTE TO PROVIDE FAMILY CHILD CARE
DURING THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER’S ABSENCE FOR NOT MORE THAN 45
WORKING DAYS IN ANY 12–MONTH PERIOD.
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO OTHERWISE LIMIT THE
AUTHORITY OF THE DEPARTMENT TO ESTABLISH REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(1) A FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER TO DESIGNATE A SUBSTITUTE
TO PROVIDE FAMILY CHILD CARE IN THE FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER’S ABSENCE;
AND
(2) THE QUALIFICATIONS NECESSARY TO SERVE AS A SUBSTITUTE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –